California, session 20252026, AB1879.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 7.45 (commencing with Section 11833.08) is added to Part 2 of Division 10.5 of the Health and Safety Code, to read: CHAPTER 7.45. Treatment or Residential Data Reporting11833.08. (a) This section applies to all both of the following entities:(1) An alcohol or other drug recovery or treatment facility, licensed by the department pursuant to Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 11834.01).(2) An alcohol or other drug program, certified by the department pursuant to Chapter 7.1 (commencing with Section 11832).(3)A recovery residence, as defined in Section 11833.05.(b) Commencing on January 1, 2028, an entity listed in subdivision (a) shall annually submit to the department all of the following data for the corresponding year: treatment and outcome information and treatment availability information consistent with the requirements of the California Outcomes Measurement System Treatment system and the Drug and Alcohol Treatment Access Report.(1)Number of individuals receiving treatment services from, or residing in, the respective entity.(2)Whether an individual had previously received treatment services from, or resided in, an entity of that category.(3)Duration of treatment or residential period for each individual within the respective entity.(c)The department shall collect the data submitted pursuant to subdivision (b) and shall publish an annual report about the data for the corresponding year on the department’s internet website.(d)Data submitted pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be in individualized form, whereas data published pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be in aggregated form.(e)(1)Data submitted pursuant to subdivision (b) and data published pursuant to subdivision (c) shall exclude any personally identifiable information about the individuals described in this section.(2)This section shall be implemented in a manner not in conflict with federal or state privacy laws.(c) Data submitted pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be provided in a form and manner and in accordance with timelines prescribed by the department.(d) (1) This section does not apply to an entity listed in subdivision (a) that is contracted to provide Medi-Cal treatment services or contracted with the department, a county behavioral health department, a county substance use disorder division for the provision of substance use disorder services, or that is otherwise required to submit data to a county through the California Outcome Measurement System Treatment system.(2) This section does not impose additional or new reporting requirements on an entity listed in subdivision (a) that reports data to the department pursuant to the California Outcomes Measurement System Treatment system and the Drug and Alcohol Treatment Access Report.